California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11378.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide a seamless and minimally intrusive process to allow an otherwise federally eligible child who is receiving assistance payments under this article to access the benefits of federally funded Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385). The transition to federally funded Kin-GAP shall be accomplished with minimal disruption to the existing relative guardian and the child, and with no break in the continuity of assistance payments.

(b) Effective on the date that the director executes the declaration described in Section 11379, at the time of the annual redetermination of the state-funded Kin-GAP benefits,
 the county shall determine whether the child was receiving federal AFDC-FC payments prior to receiving Kin-GAP, while a dependent child or ward of the juvenile court. Those children determined to have previously received AFDC-FC payments shall be reassigned to the county social worker, who shall inform the relative guardian, and the child if over 12 years of age, of the benefits of transitioning to federal Kin-GAP and the process for making the transition. The process described in this subdivision shall continue for at least 12 calendar months, or until all state-funded Kin-GAP cases as of the effective date described in this subdivision have been processed.

(c) Upon completion of the negotiated Kin-GAP agreement and confirmation that the child satisfies the conditions for federal financial participation, the child shall be eligible for federally funded Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section
 11385).

(d) The county shall terminate the state-funded Kin-GAP payment made pursuant to the former Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360), and with no break in the continuity of aid, shall commence payments under the federal Kin-GAP program pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   This section also became operative on January 1, 2011, pursuant to Section 11379.)
-------------------------------------------

11379.

This article shall become operative on the date that the Director of Social Services executes the declaration required pursuant to Section 11217, stating that increased federal financial participation from the Emergency Contingency Fund for State Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) Programs is no longer available pursuant to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA) (Public Law 111-5) or subsequent federal legislation, including an amendment to the ARRA, that maintains or extends increased federal financial participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 34.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note: Pursuant to this section, Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360), as added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, became operative on January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payments for Children [11385. - 11393.]

11385.

(a) On and after the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, the State Department of Social Services shall exercise its option under Section 671(a)(28) of Title 42 of the United States Code to enter into kinship guardianship assistance agreements to provide federally funded kinship guardianship assistance payments on behalf of children to grandparents and other relatives who have assumed legal guardianship of the children for whom they have cared as approved relative caregivers and for whom they have committed to care on a permanent basis, as provided in Section 673(d) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) A kinship guardianship assistance payment made under this
 article on behalf of a child shall not exceed the rate for children placed in a licensed or approved home pursuant to Section 11461.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that relative guardians of children in long-term, stable placements who previously were receiving kinship guardianship assistance payments on behalf of those children under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) shall instead receive assistance under this article to the extent that those children are otherwise eligible under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.)).

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that no county currently participating in the Child Welfare Demonstration Capped Allocation Project be adversely impacted by the department’s exercise of its option under Section 671(a)(28) of Title 42 of the United States Code
 to enter into kinship assistance agreements as provided in Section 673(d) of Title 42 of the United States Code. Therefore, the department shall negotiate with the United States Department of Health and Human Services on behalf of those counties that are currently participating in the demonstration project to ensure that those counties receive reimbursement for these new programs outside of the provisions of those counties’ waiver under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 37.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11386.

Aid shall be provided under this article on behalf of a child under 18 years of age, and to any eligible youth under 19 years of age, as provided in Section 11403, under all of the following conditions:

(a) The child satisfies both of the following requirements:

(1) He or she has been removed from his or her home pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement, or as a result of judicial determination, including being adjudged a dependent child of the court, pursuant to Section 300, or a ward of the court, pursuant to Section 601 or 602, to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child.

(2) He or she has been eligible for federal foster care maintenance payments under Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) while residing for at least six consecutive months in the approved home of the prospective relative guardian while under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or a voluntary placement agreement.

(b) Being returned to the parental home or being adopted are not appropriate permanency options for the child.

(c) The child demonstrates a strong attachment to the relative guardian, and the relative guardian has a strong commitment to caring permanently for the child and, with respect to the child who has attained 12 years of age, the child has been consulted regarding the kinship guardianship
 arrangement.

(d) The child has had a kinship guardianship established pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26.

(e) The child has had his or her dependency jurisdiction terminated pursuant to Section 366.3, or his or her wardship terminated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to the establishment of the kinship guardianship.

(f) If the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, are met and, subsequent to the termination of dependency jurisdiction, any parent or person having an interest files with the juvenile court a petition pursuant to Section 388 to change, modify, or set aside an order of the court, Kin-GAP payments shall continue unless and until the juvenile court
 orders the child removed from the home of the guardian, terminates the guardianship, or maintains dependency jurisdiction after the court concludes the hearing on the petition filed under Section 388.

(g) A child or nonminor former dependent or ward shall be eligible for Kin-GAP payments if he or she meets one of the following age criteria:

(1) He or she is under 18 years of age.

(2) He or she is under 21 years of age and has a physical or mental disability that warrants the continuation of assistance.

(3) Through December 31, 2011, he or she satisfies the conditions of Section 11403, and on and after January 1, 2012, he or she satisfies the conditions of
 Section 11403.01.

(4) He or she satisfies the conditions described in subdivision (h).

(h) Effective January 1, 2012, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 19 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2013, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 20 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2014, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 21 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before
 the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced. To be eligible for continued payments, the youth shall satisfy one or more of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.

(i) (1) Termination of the guardianship with a kinship guardian shall terminate eligibility for Kin-GAP, unless the conditions of Section 11403 apply. However, if a successor guardian is appointed pursuant to Section 366.3 who is also a kinship guardian, the successor guardian shall be entitled to receive Kin-GAP on behalf of the child pursuant to this article if the reason for the appointment of the successor guardian is the death or incapacity of the kinship guardian and the successor guardian is named in the kinship guardianship assistance agreement or amendment to the agreement. A new period
 of six months of placement with the successor guardian shall not be required if that successor guardian has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.3, subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, and paragraph (2), and the court terminates dependency jurisdiction, subject to federal approval of amendments to the state plan.

(2) (A) In addition to the state-level criminal records check described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, the county welfare department shall require each prospective successor guardian, and any other person over 18 years of age living in the home, to be fingerprinted, and shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency any criminal record of that person to determine whether the person has ever been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation.

(B) If the criminal records check indicates that the prospective successor guardian has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the case shall not be eligible for Kin-GAP funding.

(C) If the proposed successor guardian has been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation or arrested for an offense specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, except for the civil penalty language, the criminal background check provisions specified in subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply, and an exemption shall be issued prior to issuance of any Kin-GAP funding. Exemptions from the criminal records
 clearance requirements set forth in this section may be granted by the county using the exemption criteria specified in subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code and any applicable written directives or regulations adopted by the department.

(3) A prospective successor guardian shall not be required to be approved as a resource family pursuant to Section 16519.5 for the sole purpose of receiving Kin-GAP funding on behalf of an eligible child in the care of the prospective successor guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 30.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11387.

(a) In order to receive federal financial participation for payments under this article, the county child welfare agency or probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 shall negotiate and enter into a written, binding, kinship guardianship assistance agreement with the relative guardian of an eligible child, and provide the relative guardian with a copy of the agreement. The negotiated agreement shall be executed prior to establishment of the guardianship.

(b) The agreement shall specify, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The amount of and manner in which the kinship guardianship assistance payment
 will be provided under the agreement, that the amount is subject to any applicable increases pursuant to cost-of-living adjustments established by statute and the manner in which the agreement may be adjusted periodically, but no less frequently than every two years, in consultation with the relative guardian, based on the circumstances of the relative guardian and the needs of the child.

(2) Additional services and assistance for which the child and relative guardian will be eligible under the agreement.

(3) A procedure by which the relative guardian may apply for additional services, as needed, including, but not limited to, the filing of a petition under Section 388 to have dependency jurisdiction resumed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 366.3.

(4) The agreement shall provide that it shall remain in effect
 regardless of the state of residency of the relative guardian.

(5) The responsibility of the relative guardian for reporting changes in the needs of the child or the circumstances of the relative guardian that affect payment.

(6) For a guardianship established on and after January 1, 2012, payment shall be made for reasonable and verified nonrecurring expenses associated with obtaining legal guardianship not to exceed the amount specified in federal law. Reimbursement shall not be made for costs otherwise reimbursed from other sources, including the foster care maintenance payment. The agreement shall indicate the maximum amount, the purpose of the expense, and the process for obtaining reimbursement of the nonrecurring expenses to be paid.

(c) In accordance with the Kin-GAP agreement, the relative guardian shall be
 paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the relative guardian but that shall not exceed the foster care maintenance payment that would have been paid based on the age-related state-approved foster family home care rate and any applicable specialized care increment for a child placed in a licensed or approved family home pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 11461. In addition, the rate paid for a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment shall include an amount equal to the clothing allowance, as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 11461, including any applicable rate adjustments. For a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment who is a teen parent, the rate shall include the two-hundred-dollar ($200) monthly payment made to the relative caregiver in a whole family foster home pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465.

(d) Commencing on
 the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, and notwithstanding subdivision (c), in accordance with the Kin-GAP agreement the relative guardian shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the relative guardian, as follows:

(1) For cases in which the dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on or before June 30, 2011, or the date specified in a final order, for which the time to appeal has passed, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in California State Foster Parent Association et al. v. William Lightbourne, et al. (U.S. Dist. Ct. No. C 07-05086 WHA), whichever is earlier, the rate paid shall not exceed the basic foster care maintenance payment rate structure in effect prior to the effective
 date specified in the order described in this paragraph.

(2) For cases in which dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on or after July 1, 2011, or the date specified in the order described in paragraph (1), whichever is earlier, and through December 31, 2016, the rate paid shall not exceed the basic foster care maintenance payment rate structure effective and available as of December 31, 2016.

(3) For cases in which dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on or after January 1, 2017, and before July 1,
 2027, or the effective date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, as applicable, the rate paid shall not exceed the home-based family care rate structure developed pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11461 and Section 11463.

(4) (A) For cases in which dependency has been dismissed pursuant to Section 366.3 or wardship has been terminated pursuant to Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to establishment of the guardianship, on and after July 1, 2027, or the date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the rate paid shall not exceed Tier 1 of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461,
 unless the conditions of subparagraph (B) apply.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the rate paid may exceed Tier 1, but shall not exceed Tier 2, of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, under specific conditions established by the department and based on assessed needs of the child.

(5) Beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Kin-GAP benefit payment rate structure shall be adjusted annually by the percentage change in the California Necessities Index, as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 11461, without requiring a new agreement.

(6) In addition to the rate paid for a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment, a specialized care increment, if applicable, as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 11461, shall be paid.

(7) In addition to the rate paid for a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment, a clothing allowance, as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 11461, shall be paid.

(8) For a child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment who is a teen parent, the rate shall include the two-hundred-dollar ($200) monthly payment made to the relative caregiver in a whole family foster home pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465.

(e) The county child welfare agency or probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 shall provide the relative guardian with information, in writing, on the availability of the federal Kin-GAP program with an explanation of the difference between these benefits and Adoption Assistance
 Program benefits and AFDC-FC benefits. The agency shall also provide the relative guardian with information on the availability of mental health services through the Medi-Cal program or other programs.

(f) The county child welfare agency, probation department, or Indian tribe, as appropriate, shall assess the needs of the child and the circumstances of the related guardian and is responsible for determining that the child meets the eligibility criteria for payment.

(g) Payments on behalf of a child who is a recipient of Kin-GAP benefits and who is also a consumer of regional center services shall be based on the rates established by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 11464.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 16.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11388.

If a federally eligible child described in Section 11386 has one or more siblings who are not so described, the child and any sibling of the child may be placed in the same kinship guardianship arrangement, in accordance with Section 671(a)(31) of Title 42 of the United States Code, if the county child welfare department or probation department or Indian tribe that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 and the prospective relative guardian agree on the appropriateness of the arrangement for the siblings. Kinship guardianship assistance payments may be paid on behalf of each sibling, at a per-child rate, placed in accordance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 37.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11389.

A child eligible for a Kin-GAP payment under this article is categorically eligible for Medi-Cal at no share of cost pursuant to Section 473(b)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 673(b)(3)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 37.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11390.

(a) A person who is a kinship guardian under this article, and who has met the requirements of Section 361.4, is exempt from identity verification requirements for the CalWORKs program. A guardian who is also an applicant for, or a recipient of, benefits under the CalWORKs program shall comply with the identity verification requirements for the CalWORKs program, as those statutory and regulatory requirements existed on October 1, 2018.

(b) Any exemptions exercised pursuant to this section shall be implemented in accordance with Section 11393.

(c) Income to the child, including the Kin-GAP payment, shall not be considered income to the kinship guardian for purposes of determining the kinship
 guardian’s eligibility for any other aid program, unless required by federal law as a condition of the receipt of federal financial participation.

(d) Each county that formally had court-ordered jurisdiction under Section 300 or Section 601 or 602 over a child receiving benefits under the Kin-GAP Program shall be responsible for paying the child’s aid regardless of where the child actually resides.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, when a child receiving benefits under the AFDC-FC program becomes eligible for benefits under the Kin-GAP Program during any month, the child shall continue to receive benefits under the AFDC-FC program, as appropriate, through the day that the juvenile court dismisses the dependency or terminates the wardship, and Kin-GAP payments shall begin the day following the day that the juvenile court dismisses the dependency or terminates the wardship.

(f) Both of the following shall apply to any child or nonminor in receipt of Kin-GAP benefits:

(1) The child or nonminor is eligible to request and receive independent living services pursuant to Section 10609.3.

(2) Income or property received after the beginning date of receipt of Kin-GAP benefits shall be disregarded.

(g) Amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall become operative on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) can perform the necessary automation to implement the amendments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 17.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11391.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payments (Kin-GAP)” means the aid provided on behalf of children eligible for federal financial participation under Section 671(a)(28) of Title 42 of the United States Code in kinship care under the terms of this article.

(b) “Kinship guardian” means a person who meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The person has been appointed the legal guardian of a dependent child pursuant to Section 366.26 or Section 360 or a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to subdivision (d) of
 Section 728.

(2) The person is a relative of the child.

(c) “Relative,” subject to federal approval of amendments to the state plan, means any of the following:

(1) An adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” or “grand” or the spouse of any of those persons even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

(2) An adult who meets the definition of an approved, nonrelated extended family member, as described in Section 362.7.

(3) An adult who is either a member of the Indian child’s tribe, or an Indian custodian, as defined in Section
 224.1.

(4) An adult who is the current foster parent of a child under the juvenile court’s jurisdiction, who has established a significant and family-like relationship with the child, and the child and the county child welfare agency, probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 identify this adult as the child’s permanent connection.

(5) An adult who meets the definition of an extended family member as described in Section 224.1.

(d) “Sibling” means a child related to the identified eligible child by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent.

(e) “Approved home of the prospective relative guardian” means either of the following:

(1) The home of a relative who has been approved as a resource family home pursuant to Section 16519.5 of this code, or Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The home of a relative who has been approved as a tribally approved home, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 27.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11392.

On and after the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, for purposes of eligibility under this article, children who are currently receiving Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) and who were determined eligible under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.)) as dependent children of the juvenile court placed in foster care with an approved relative and who remain under the court’s jurisdiction pursuant to Section 366.4 shall be deemed to meet the eligibility criteria as described in Section 673(d) of Title 42 of the United States Code. On and after the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, the county child welfare department,
 probation department, or Indian tribe, as appropriate, at the time of each Subtitle IV-E eligible child’s Kin-GAP annual redetermination, shall meet with the relative guardian and child and enter into the written negotiated agreement as described in Section 11387.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 37.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11393.

(a) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) the department may implement the applicable provisions of the federally funded Kin-GAP Program through all-county letters or similar instructions from the director.

(b) The department shall develop both the all-county letter instructions and regulations in consultation with concerned stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the County Welfare Directors Association, the Chief Probation Officers of California, representatives of California Indian tribes, the California Youth Connection, former foster youth, child advocacy organizations, labor
 organizations, foster caregiver organizations, and researchers.

(c) The director shall adopt regulations as otherwise necessary, to implement the applicable provisions of the federally funded Kin-GAP Program. Emergency regulations to implement the applicable provisions of this act may be adopted by the director in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The initial adoption of the emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those emergency regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180
 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 37.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Aid to Families With Dependent Children—Foster Care [11400. - 11410.]

11400.

For purposes of this article, and Article 6 (commencing with Section 11450), the following definitions apply:

(a) “Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care (AFDC-FC)” means the aid provided on behalf of needy children in foster care under the terms of this division.

(b) “Case plan” means a written document that, at a minimum, specifies the type of home in which the child shall be placed, the safety of that home, and the appropriateness of that home to meet the child’s needs. It shall also include the agency’s plan for ensuring that the child receive proper care and protection in a safe environment, and shall set forth
 the appropriate services to be provided to the child, the child’s family, and the foster parents, in order to meet the child’s needs while in foster care, and to reunify the child with the child’s family. In addition, the plan shall specify the services that will be provided or steps that will be taken to facilitate an alternate permanent plan if reunification is not possible.

(c) “Certified family home” means an individual or family certified by a licensed foster family agency and issued a certificate of approval by that agency as meeting licensing standards, and used exclusively by that foster family agency for placements.

(d) “Family home” means the family residence of a licensee in which 24-hour care and supervision are provided for children.

(e) “Small family home” means any residential facility, in the
 licensee’s family residence, which provides 24-hour care for six or fewer foster children who have mental disorders or developmental or physical disabilities and who require special care and supervision as a result of their disabilities.

(f) “Foster care” means the 24-hour out-of-home care provided to children whose own families are unable or unwilling to care for them, and who are in need of temporary or long-term substitute parenting.

(g) “Foster family agency” means a licensed community care facility, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code. Private foster family agencies shall be organized and operated on a nonprofit basis.

(h) “Group home” means a nondetention privately operated residential home, organized and operated on a nonprofit basis only, of any
 capacity, or a nondetention licensed residential care home operated by the County of San Mateo with a capacity of up to 25 beds, that accepts children in need of care and supervision in a group home, as defined by paragraph (13) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) “Periodic review” means review of a child’s status by the juvenile court or by an administrative review panel, that shall include a consideration of the safety of the child, a determination of the continuing need for placement in foster care, evaluation of the goals for the placement and the progress toward meeting these goals, and development of a target date for the child’s return home or establishment of alternative permanent placement.

(j) “Permanency planning hearing” means a hearing conducted by the juvenile court in which the child’s future status, including whether the child
 shall be returned home or another permanent plan shall be developed, is determined.

(k) “Placement and care” refers to the responsibility for the welfare of a child vested in an agency or organization by virtue of the agency or organization having (1) been delegated care, custody, and control of a child by the juvenile court, (2) taken responsibility, pursuant to a relinquishment or termination of parental rights on a child, (3) taken the responsibility of supervising a child detained by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 319 or 636, or (4) signed a voluntary placement agreement for the child’s placement; or to the responsibility designated to an individual by virtue of the individual being appointed the child’s legal guardian.

(l) “Preplacement preventive services” means services that are designed to help children remain with their families by preventing or eliminating the
 need for removal.

(m) “Relative” means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” or “grand” or the spouse of any of these persons even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

(n) “Nonrelative extended family member” means an adult caregiver who has an established familial or mentoring relationship with the child, as described in Section 362.7.

(o) “Voluntary placement” means an out-of-home placement of a child by (1) the county welfare department, probation department, or Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, after the parents or guardians have requested the assistance of the county
 welfare department and have signed a voluntary placement agreement, or (2) the county welfare department licensed public or private adoption agency, or the department acting as an adoption agency, after the parents have requested the assistance of either the county welfare department, the licensed public or private adoption agency, or the department acting as an adoption agency for the purpose of adoption planning, and have signed a voluntary placement agreement.

(p) “Voluntary placement agreement” means a written agreement between either the county welfare department, probation department, or Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, licensed public or private adoption agency, or the department acting as an adoption agency, and the parents or guardians of a child that specifies, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The legal status of the child.

(2) The rights and obligations of the parents or guardians, the child, and the agency in which the child is placed.

(q) “Original placement date” means the most recent date on which the court detained a child and ordered an agency to be responsible for supervising the child or the date on which an agency assumed responsibility for a child due to termination of parental rights, relinquishment, or voluntary placement.

(r) (1) “Transitional housing placement provider” means an organization licensed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code to provide supervised transitional housing services to foster children who are at least 16 years of age. A transitional housing placement provider shall be privately operated and organized on a nonprofit
 basis.

(2) Before licensure, a provider shall obtain certification from the applicable county, in accordance with Section 16522.1.

(s) “Transitional Housing Program-Plus” means a provider certified by the applicable county, in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 16522, to provide transitional housing services to former foster youth who have exited the foster care system on or after their 18th birthday.

(t) “Whole family foster home” means a resource family, licensed foster family home, approved relative caregiver or nonrelative extended family member’s home, the home of a nonrelated legal guardian whose
 guardianship was established pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26, certified family home, or a host family of a transitional housing placement provider, that provides foster care for a minor or nonminor dependent parent and their child, and is specifically recruited and trained to assist the minor or nonminor dependent parent in developing the skills necessary to provide a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child. The child of the minor or nonminor dependent parent need not be the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 300 to qualify for placement in a whole family foster home.

(u) “Mutual agreement” means any of the following:

(1) A written voluntary agreement of consent for continued placement and care in a supervised setting between a minor or, on and after January 1, 2012, a nonminor dependent, and the county welfare services or probation department or tribal
 agency responsible for the foster care placement, that documents the nonminor’s continued willingness to remain in supervised out-of-home placement under the placement and care of the responsible county, tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that has entered into an agreement with the state pursuant to Section 10553.1, remain under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as a nonminor dependent, and report any change of circumstances relevant to continued eligibility for foster care payments, and that documents the nonminor’s and social worker’s or probation officer’s agreement to work together to facilitate implementation of the mutually developed supervised placement agreement and transitional independent living case plan.

(2) An agreement, as described in paragraph (1), between a nonminor former dependent or ward in receipt of Kin-GAP payments under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with
 Section 11385), and the agency responsible for the Kin-GAP benefits, provided that the nonminor former dependent or ward satisfies the conditions described in Section 11403.01, or one or more of the conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403. For purposes of this paragraph and paragraph (3), “nonminor former dependent or ward” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (aa).

(3) An agreement, as described in paragraph (1), between a nonminor former dependent or ward in receipt of AFDC-FC payments under subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 11405 and the agency responsible for the AFDC-FC benefits, provided that the nonminor former dependent or ward described in subdivision (e) of Section 11405 satisfies one or more of the conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, and the nonminor described in subdivision (f) of Section 11405 satisfies the
 secondary school or equivalent training or certificate program conditions described in that subdivision.
